Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.075

Damages by breachy animals.

The owner of any animal that is unruly, and in the habit of breaking through or throwing down fences, if after being notified that such animal is unruly and in the habit of breaking through or throwing down fences as aforesaid, he or she shall allow such animal to run at large, shall be liable for all damages caused by such animal, and any and all other animals, that may be in company with such animal.

[ 2011 c 336 s 429; Code 1881 s 2499; 1873 p 449 s 12; 1871 p 66 s 12; 1869 p 326 s 12; RRS s 5452. Formerly RCW 16.04.090, part. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 2500; 1873 p 450 s 13; 1871 p 66 s 13; RRS s 5453, now codified as RCW 16.60.076.]